North Carolina, session 2025, HB758.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Agency for Families in Distress,
Inc., a nonprofit organization, to help fund "The Mind and Heart Haven Project" which seeks to
address the growing mental health crisis in Winston-Salem, Forsyth County, and North Carolina
as a whole.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H758-v-1*